Rhode Island statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 5 Maintenance of Town Highways

24-5-1.
Duty of town to maintain highways.

All highways, causeways, and bridges, except as provided by this chapter, lying and being within the bounds of any town, shall be kept in repair and amended, from time to time, so that the highways, causeways, and bridges may be safe and convenient for travelers with their teams, carts, and carriages at all seasons of the year, at the proper charge and expense of the town, under the care and direction of the town council of the town, provided that the state shall be responsible for the annual cleaning of all sidewalks on all state highways, causeways, and bridges.

In addition, the surfaces of all highways and causeways shall be maintained in such a state of repair as to make them safe for bicycles.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-1

; P.L. 1975, ch. 300, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 307, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 56.

24-5-1.1.
Alteration of roadways.

Any person, firm, or corporation including utilities and contractors who or that alter a roadway that is subject to the provisions of this chapter shall restore that portion of the roadway that was altered to the same or better condition that existed prior to alteration or as required in accordance with the state or municipal permit requirements. Repaving and repair of a roadway by a public utility or utility facility shall be in accordance with and subject to the provisions of chapter 2.2 of title 39.

Municipalities shall adopt by ordinance standards for use of steel or other suitably manufactured plates on municipal roadways that shall, at a minimum, require compliance with the provisions specified in §

24-8-45

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 335, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 170, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 184, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 234, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 253, § 1.

24-5-2.
Division of towns into districts — Election and terms of surveyors.

The town council of each town shall divide the town into highway districts not exceeding four (4) in number, or shall constitute the entire town one highway district, and shall annually elect one surveyor of highways for each highway district, and fix his or her compensation; provided, however, that in the town of South Kingstown the powers and duties of surveyors of highways shall vest in the town council and the town shall not be required to elect surveyors of highways, and provided further that in the town of Smithfield there shall be one highway district which shall constitute the entire town, and one highway commissioner who shall be elected and be compensated and hold office as provided in Public Laws 1930, chapter 1675; the highway commissioner to perform the duties of highway surveyor in the town and have all the power and authority and be subject to all the duties now pertaining to the office of highway surveyors elected by the town councils under the laws of the state. Surveyors of highways so elected shall hold their offices until the next annual financial town meeting of the town and thereafter until their successors are elected. Vacancies occurring from any cause may be filled by the town council, and the town council may remove from office any surveyor of highways elected by them at their pleasure.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 2; P.L. 1929, ch. 1365, § 1; P.L. 1930, ch. 1675, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-2

.

24-5-3.
Annual town appropriation.

Each town, at some regularly called meeting of the electors thereof who are entitled to vote upon any proposition to impose a tax, shall annually appropriate such sum of money as the electors shall deem necessary for the maintenance and repair of its highways and bridges, and the sum so appropriated shall be included in the sum to be raised by the annual tax levied and assessed by the town for town purposes. In case any town shall fail to make an appropriation, the town council thereof shall make such expenditure upon the highways and bridges of the town as may be necessary to comply with the provisions of §

24-5-1

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 3; P.L. 1910, ch. 594, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-3

.

24-5-4.
Appropriations expended under department of transportation — State aid.

Whenever any town shall make an annual appropriation equal to or in addition to the sum of twenty cents ($.20) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of the ratable property of such town, and whenever the electors at the meeting shall direct that the appropriation be expended under the care and direction of the department of transportation, the town shall be entitled to state aid in the care and maintenance of its public highways, causeways, and bridges, other than state highways, in the following amount: A sum of money not exceeding one-fifth (1/5) of the money appropriated as aforesaid by any town, out of any money specifically appropriated by the general assembly to be used and expended by the department of transportation for the repair, care, and maintenance of public highways, causeways, and bridges in the respective towns; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her order upon the general treasurer for the money so appropriated, upon proper vouchers signed by the director of transportation. Whenever the electors at the meeting shall direct the appropriation as aforesaid to be expended under the direction of the department of transportation, the town treasurer of the town shall pay such highway bills for highway expenditures in the town as are properly audited by the director of transportation, not exceeding the amount of the town’s appropriation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 3, as enacted by P.L. 1910, ch. 594, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, §§ 65, 100; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-4

.

24-5-5.
Allotments to highway districts — Supervision of expenditures — Rates of compensation.

Town councils shall determine and allot the proportion of the annual appropriation for the maintenance and repair of highways and bridges, which shall be expended within the limits of each highway district in their respective towns, and so much of the appropriation as shall be expended under their care and direction, or under the care and direction of a committee or committees of their own members appointed by them for that purpose. They shall also fix the rate of compensation to be paid for personnel, teams, road making machinery, and materials to be employed or used in their respective towns.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-5

.

24-5-6.
Expenditures by contract — Unexpended funds.

Whenever any town council shall be of the opinion that it is preferable to do so, they may provide for the expenditure by contract of a portion or all of the money allotted to be expended in any one or more highway districts; and if the work so done by contract shall extend into two (2) or more highway districts, they may determine what proportion of the cost thereof shall be paid from the money allotted to each of the highway districts. All money so allotted and not expended by contract shall, when expended, be expended by the surveyor of highways of the district to which it was allotted.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-6

.

24-5-7.
Special appropriations for particular projects.

Whenever any town shall make, in addition to its annual appropriation for the maintenance and repair of its highways and bridges, a special appropriation for the building or repair of any particular highway or bridge or other highway work, and shall not provide that the appropriation be expended by contract, the town council of the town shall determine whether the appropriation shall be so expended; and if not expended by contract, it shall be expended by the surveyor of highways of the district within which the work is to be done.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-7

.

24-5-8.
General duties of surveyors of highways.

Every surveyor of highways shall execute the directions given to the surveyor by the town council or the committee thereof as provided for in this chapter, and shall purchase and use such materials and employ such personnel, teams, and road making apparatus as may be necessary therefor at the rates of compensation fixed by the town council. The surveyor shall keep himself or herself informed as to the condition of all the highways in the surveyor’s district, taking particular care to do so immediately after all storms and freshets, and shall seasonably communicate such information to the town council or to the committee thereof having care of his or her district; and it shall be the surveyor’s duty, in case of sudden and unforeseen damage to any highway or bridge, to immediately repair the damage at the expense of the town so that it will be safe and passable, without instruction or direction from the town council or committee.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-8

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 56.

24-5-9.
Removal of obstructions by surveyors.

Surveyors of highways may cut down, lop off, dig up, and remove all sorts of trees, bushes, stones, fences, rails, gates, bars, enclosures, or other matter or thing that shall in any manner straighten, obstruct, or incommode any highway; provided, that nothing herein contained shall be so construed as to authorize any surveyor, except under the direction of the town council, to cut down or destroy, or other than in a reasonable and proper manner, to lop off or trim up any shade or ornamental tree so planted or maintained by any adjacent owner or occupant upon or near the side of any highways as not to incommode the traveled path.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-9

.

24-5-10.
Taking of road materials from adjoining land.

Any surveyor of highways may, with the consent of the town council or committee thereof having care and direction of his or her district, for the purpose of obtaining materials for repairing any highway, enter upon and dig for stone, gravel, clay, marl, sand, or earth in any adjoining land not forming a part of the messuage connected with any dwelling house, or not used as a cemetery or burial ground or otherwise appropriated to the burial of the dead; and may remove the material thus dug up to a place or places in the highways for the repair and amendment thereof as the surveyor shall deem necessary; provided, that land which is platted in house lots, and the plat thereof recorded in the land records of the town where it lies, shall not be so entered upon.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-10

.

24-5-11.
Damage in removing obstructions or materials.

All claims for damages for any acts done or materials taken under §§

24-5-9

and

24-5-10

shall be claims against the town under which the surveyor of highways acted.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-11

.

24-5-12.
Fine for neglect to keep highways in repair.

Every town which shall neglect to keep in good repair its highways and bridges shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), and execution shall issue therefor against the town.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-12

.

24-5-13.
Liability of cities and towns for injuries from defective roads.

The cities and towns shall also be liable to all persons who may in any way suffer injury to their persons or property by reason of any neglect, to be recovered in a civil action except as provided in subsection (b).

If any person shall incur damage to his or her motor vehicle by reason of a pothole on any municipal highway, causeway, street or bridge which damage would not have occurred without the existence of the pothole, he or she may recover from the municipality the amount of damages sustained up to and not more than the sum of three hundred dollars ($300). Provided, however, that the municipality had reasonable notice of the pothole, or may have had notice thereof by the exercise of proper care and diligence on its part, and a reasonable opportunity to repair the pothole. All claims shall be made within a period of seven (7) days from the date on which the damage was sustained by filing a written report in a manner prescribed by the municipality. In no instance, however, shall any claim for damage so caused to a motor vehicle registered in a foreign state be considered unless that state has a similar statute affording similar protection to persons owning motor vehicles registered in this state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-13

; P.L. 1994, ch. 104, § 1.

24-5-14.
Snow and ice removal.

The several towns shall provide by ordinance in a manner and under such penalties as they may deem expedient, for removing snow from the public highways so as to render the public highways passable with teams, sleds, and sleighs; but nothing contained in this chapter shall be so construed as to render any town or city liable for any injury to person or property caused by snow or ice obstructing any or any part of the highways therein, unless notice in writing of the existence of the particular obstruction shall have been given to the surveyor of highways within whose district the obstruction exists, at least twenty-four (24) hours before the injury was caused, and the town or surveyor shall not thereupon within twenty-four (24) hours of notification have commenced the removal of the obstruction, or caused any sidewalk which may have been obstructed by ice to be rendered passable, by spreading ashes or other like substances thereon. Whenever any highway is blocked up or encumbered with snow, the surveyor shall cause so much thereof to be removed or trod down as to render the highway passable.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-14

.

Artificial Obstructions.

The notice required by this section applied to obstructions caused by artificial means as well as by natural means. Winsor v. Tripp,

12 R.I. 454

,

1879 R.I. LEXIS 55

(1879).

24-5-15.
Penalty for failure to remove snow.

If the snow is allowed to remain in any public highway in any town so as to obstruct any person in passing along the highway with his or her team, sled, or sleigh, for twenty-four (24) hours after the highway shall become obstructed, the town shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100); but nothing herein contained shall be so construed as to subject any town to the fine provided for in this section if the surveyor of highways, or some other person duly authorized for that purpose by the town, with the power vested in him or her by the laws of the state, shall have commenced the removal of the obstructions within the time provided for in this section, and shall within three (3) days remove the obstructions.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-15

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 56.

24-5-16.
Diversion of water to damage of individuals prohibited.

No surveyor of highways shall cause any watercourse in any highway to be so conveyed as to incommode any person’s land, house, store, shop or other building, or to obstruct any person in the prosecution of his or her business or occupation, without the consent or approbation of the town council of the town, signified in writing to the surveyor.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-16

.

24-5-17.
Complaint and alteration of watercourse.

Any person who may consider himself or herself aggrieved by a watercourse may complain to the town council; and the council on receiving his or her complaint and examining into the circumstances of the complaint, shall, if they think reasonable, direct the surveyor to alter the watercourse in such manner as they shall think proper.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-17

.

24-5-18.
Bridges and fences on artificial watercourses along preexisting highways.

Whenever any artificial watercourse has been or shall be made under, through or by the side of any highway previously existing, the proprietors or occupants of the watercourse shall make and maintain all necessary bridges over the watercourse and all fences which may be necessary along the side of the watercourse.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-18

.

24-5-19.
Bridges and fences along preexisting watercourses.

Whenever any highway has been or shall be laid out, over, or by the side of any artificial watercourse made previously to the laying out of the highway, the town laying out the highway shall make and maintain the necessary bridges over the watercourse and the fences along the side of the watercourse as may be needed for the safety of travelers.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-19

.

24-5-20.
Bridges on boundary lines.

All public bridges, except such as are part of the state highway system, on the dividing lines between towns shall be established and kept in repair at the expense of the towns adjoining the bridges; and every public bridge except such as are part of the state highway system on the dividing line between this state and the adjoining states shall be established and kept in repair, on the part of this state, at the expense of the town adjoining the bridge.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 19; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-20

.

24-5-21.
Penalty for neglect of boundary line bridge.

If any town adjoining any boundary line bridge shall refuse or neglect to keep in good repair the part of the bridge within and next adjoining the line of the town, the town so neglecting or refusing shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), and execution shall issue for the amount of the fine and costs against the town; but nothing contained in this section shall be so construed as to impair any agreement made between any towns relative to the supporting and repairing of bridges.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-21

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 56.

24-5-22.
New highway using existing bridge.

Whenever any highway has been or shall be laid out over any tract or parcel of land used at the time of the laying out as a highway, the laying out shall not be deemed or construed to affect or in any way alter the rights or duties of the town, or any individual, as to the maintenance of bridges over any part of the new highway, which so nearly coincides with the old highway as not to require the removal of the bridges or the building of them in a different place from where they previously stood.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 22; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-22

.

24-5-23.
Bridges and culverts built by adjoining landowners.

Any person owning land adjoining any public highway may build such bridges or culverts over the ditches, which may be made in the highway for the passage of water, as may be necessary to render the passage from the land to the highway safe and convenient; and no bridge or culvert shall be altered, removed, or disturbed by any person, except under the direction of the town council of the town where the bridge or culvert may be situated, or of some person by them appointed for that purpose.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 23; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-23

.

24-5-24.
Undermining of walls and fences.

No surveyor of highways shall remove the earth so near to any wall or fence erected upon or without the limits of a highway as to undermine or overthrow the wall or fence, unless the undermining or overthrowing shall be absolutely necessary for the security or convenience of the public; and, in that case, the repairs shall be made under the supervision of the town council, or of some person appointed by them; and the town shall be at the expense of repairing or resetting the wall or fence removed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 24; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-24

.

24-5-25.
Compensation of surveyors.

Surveyors of highways shall be paid out of the town treasury at the rate of two dollars ($2.00) per day for all the time necessarily spent in the discharge of the duties of their office, whenever no other mode or amount of compensation shall have been provided by any town or town council.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 25; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-25

.

24-5-26.
Penalty for neglect by surveyors.

Every surveyor of highways who shall neglect the duties of his or her trust shall forfeit twenty dollars ($20.00) for every neglect, to be recovered in the name of the town treasurer to the use of the town.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 26; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-26

.

24-5-27.
Rights of cities unimpaired.

Nothing herein contained shall be construed to affect the right of any city to maintain and repair its highways in the manner now provided by law for that city.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 27; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-27

.

24-5-28.
Determination of places where guideposts necessary.

The several town councils shall, at their meeting held next after the first day of October in each year, determine the corners and angles of all roads within their respective towns at which it shall be necessary to erect and maintain guideposts, and shall keep a record of their decision among the records of their proceedings.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 74, § 7; P.L. 1897, ch. 449, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 87, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 99, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 83, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-28

.

24-5-29.
Failure to determine places for guideposts.

Every town council which shall, at their meeting held next after the first day of October in any year, neglect or refuse to determine upon proper places at which guideposts shall be erected and maintained, shall be fined five dollars ($5.00) for every month they shall so neglect or refuse.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 74, § 11; P.L. 1897, ch. 449, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 87, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 99, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 83, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-29

.

24-5-30.
Erection of guideposts — Specifications.

The town councils shall cause to be erected and maintained, at the several corners and angles as determined pursuant to §

24-5-28

, substantial posts not less than eight feet (8´) high, upon the upper end of which shall be placed a board upon which shall be plainly and legibly painted the name of the next town, with the other noted town or place as may be judged most expedient for the direction of travelers, to which each of the roads may lead, together with the number of miles to the next town; and also the figure of a hand, with the forefinger thereof pointing toward the town or place to which the road may lead.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 74, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 87, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 99, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 83, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-30

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 56.

24-5-31.
Substitutes for guideposts.

The inhabitants of any town may agree upon some suitable substitute for the guideposts, and appoint any proper person to superintend the erection and support of the guideposts.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 74, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 87, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 99, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 83, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-31

.

24-5-32.
Penalty for failure to maintain guideposts.

Every town which shall neglect or refuse to keep, at all times, guideposts erected and maintained at the places and in the manner above prescribed, shall be fined three dollars ($3.00) for every month it shall so neglect or refuse.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 74, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 87, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 99, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 83, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-32

.

24-5-33.
Injury to guideposts.

Every person who shall injure, mar or deface any guidepost or its substitute, agreed upon as provided in §

24-5-31

, or board which shall be set up as is provided by this chapter, shall be fined not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00) nor less than five dollars ($5.00) to the use of the town.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 74, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 87, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 99, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 83, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-33

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 56.

24-5-34.
Jamestown and New Shoreham exempt.

The provisions of §§

24-5-28

—

24-5-33

shall not apply to the towns of Jamestown and New Shoreham.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 74, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 87, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 99, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 83, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

24-5-34

.

24-5-35.
Pothole hotline.

The department of transportation is hereby authorized and directed to establish a toll-free telephone hotline (1-800-pothole or 1-888-pothole, if available) for the purpose of reporting potholes to the state. If the department determines that a given pothole is not on a state highway but on a city or town highway, it shall make that information available to the respective municipality.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 504, § 1.